Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.92.060

Voter challenge of electoral system—Notice.

(1) A voter who resides in the political subdivision, an organization whose roster of members and volunteers includes a voter who resides in the political subdivision, or a tribe located at least in part in the political subdivision who intends to challenge a political subdivision's electoral system under this chapter shall first notify the political subdivision. The political subdivision shall promptly make such notice public.

(2) The notice provided shall identify and provide contact information for the person or persons who intend to file an action, and shall identify the protected class or classes whose members do not have an equal opportunity to elect candidates of their choice or an equal opportunity to influence the outcome of an election because of alleged vote dilution and polarized voting. The notice shall also include a type of remedy the person believes may address the alleged violation of RCW 29A.92.030.

[ 2023 c 56 s 5; 2019 c 64 s 9; 2018 c 113 s 301.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 56: See note following RCW 29A.92.720.

Explanatory statement—2019 c 64: See note following RCW 1.20.110.